Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. Board of Marine Pilots.

Sec. 08.62.010.
Creation and membership of board.

There is created the Board of Marine Pilots. It consists of two pilots licensed under this chapter who have been actively engaged in piloting on vessels subject to this chapter, two registered agents or managers of vessels subject to this chapter who are actively engaged in the procurement of pilotage services, two public members in accordance with AS

08.01.025

, and the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee. Not more than one pilot and one registered agent or manager may be from any one pilotage region established by the board. Not more than one registered agent or manager may be employed by, be a contractor for, or hold a financial interest in the same marine industry business entity, including commonly owned, affiliated, or subsidiary business entities. All members of the board shall be residents of the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1970; am § 8 ch 258 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 74 SLA 1995)

Sec. 08.62.020.
Appointment and term of office.

The governor shall appoint the members of the board under AS

08.01.020

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 143 SLA 1980; am § 8 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 3 ch 89 SLA 1991)

Sec. 08.62.030.
Meetings.

The board shall hold at least three regularly scheduled meetings each year. The board may hold special meetings at the call of the chair or at the request of a majority of the members of the board.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1970; am § 4 ch 89 SLA 1991)

Sec. 08.62.040.
Powers, duties, and limitations.

The board shall

provide for the maintenance of efficient and competent pilotage service on the inland and coastal water of and adjacent to the state to assure the protection of shipping, the safety of human life and property, and the protection of the marine environment;

consistent with the law, adopt regulations, subject to AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), establishing the qualifications of and required training for pilots and providing for the examination of pilots and the issuance of original or renewal pilot licenses to qualified persons;

keep a register of licensed pilots, licensed deputy pilots, and agents;

adopt regulations establishing

pilotage regions in the state;

the criteria for concurring in the amount of license, application, training, investigation, and audit fees proposed by the department under AS

08.01.065

;

the criteria for recognizing pilot organizations under AS

08.62.175

;

make available, upon request, copies of this chapter and the regulations adopted under this chapter;

review and approve the articles, bylaws, and rules of pilot organizations;

audit a pilot organization or an individual pilot as necessary to implement and enforce this chapter;

review and approve training programs conducted by pilot organizations; the board shall cooperate with the Department of Environmental Conservation in the review and approval of training programs for pilots of tank vessels;

establish and publish the dates of future license examinations; and

approve or disapprove rates for pilotage services as provided under AS

08.62.046

.

The board may, by regulation, make any other provision for proper and safe pilotage upon the inland and coastal water of and adjacent to the state and for the efficient administration of this chapter, including establishing

different licensing criteria for a pilotage region if justified by regional differences in piloting;

a mandatory drug and alcohol testing program, including random tests, post-incident tests, and tests based upon reasonable cause, for pilots licensed under this chapter and for trainees and apprentices seeking a license or endorsement under this chapter; the board may delegate responsibility for administration of all or a portion of a testing program to pilot organizations;

criteria for trainee selection and for training programs conducted by pilot organizations;

standards under which a pilot may receive a license or an endorsement to a license to pilot vessels in more than one pilotage region under AS

08.62.080(b)

; and

procedures for the review of proposed rates by the board under AS

08.62.046

.

The board may, for good cause, require a pilot licensed under this chapter to submit to a physical or mental examination to determine the pilot’s fitness to perform the duties of a pilot.

Notwithstanding the exemption from AS

45.50.562

—

45.50.596

granted to pilot organizations under AS

45.50.572(a)

, the board may not adopt a regulation or take other action resulting in anti-competitive activities that, if the board were subject to AS

45.50.562

—

45.50.596

, would violate AS 45.50.562 — 45.50.596.

The board may delegate duties to the marine pilot coordinator as necessary to assist the board in administering and enforcing this chapter.

The board may impose a civil fine on the owner or operator of a pleasure craft of foreign registry who, in violation of this chapter, fails to employ a pilot licensed under this chapter or fails to comply with the pilotage requirement under AS

08.62.180(b)

. Notwithstanding AS

08.01.075

, the amount of the civil penalty may not exceed $10,000 for each violation. Each entry into state water in violation of this chapter or AS

08.62.180(b)

is a separate violation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1970; am §§ 2, 3 ch 143 SLA 1980; am §§ 5, 6 ch 89 SLA 1991; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 74 SLA 1995; am § 2 ch 10 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 39 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 56, art. 1.

For compulsory pilotage waters, see 12 AAC 56, art. 2.

For tariffs, see 12 AAC 56, art. 3.

For recognition of pilot organizations, see 12 AAC 56, art. 4.

For very large crude carriers (VLCC), see 12 AAC 56, art. 6.

Sec. 08.62.045.
Pilotage tariffs. [Repealed, § 35 ch 89 SLA 1991.]

Sec. 08.62.046.
Rates for pilotage services.

A pilot organization recognized by the board shall adopt and publish rates for the provision of pilotage services. The pilot organization shall adopt rates for pilotage services as provided under this section. Notwithstanding this section, a pilot organization may enter into agreements with the master, owner, operator, or agent of a master, owner, or operator, of a vessel for the provision of pilotage services at rates of compensation that are different from the rates adopted under this section. Unless a pilot organization has an agreement with the master, owner, operator, or agent of a master, owner, or operator, of a vessel that sets rates for the provision of a pilotage service, the pilot organization may not charge a rate for the provision of the pilotage service to the vessel that is different from the rate adopted or established under this section.

If a pilot organization intends to adopt a new or revised rate for the provision of a pilotage service, the pilot organization shall, before October 15, send a notice of intent to adopt a rate for provision of the pilotage service to the board and to all registered agents and publish the notice on at least three days during a period of 14 consecutive days in a newspaper of general circulation in the state. The notice of intent to adopt a rate must include a copy of the proposed rate and the name and mailing address of the pilot organization that intends to adopt the rate. If no objection to the proposed rate is filed with the board under (c) of this section, the rate takes effect on January 1 of the year following the year in which the notice of the intent to adopt the rate was filed with the board.

The master, owner, operator, or agent of the master, owner, or operator, of a vessel required to employ a pilot under this chapter may object to the proposed rate for a specific pilotage service by filing a written notice of objection, containing the grounds for the objection and relevant evidence demonstrating that the rate is not reasonable, with the board within 60 days after the final date of publication of the proposed rate in a newspaper of general circulation. The pilot organization that proposed the rate has until 15 days after the close of the period for filing objections to the proposed rate to provide its written response to the notice of objection and relevant evidence demonstrating that the rate is reasonable. If the pilot organization does not respond to the notice of objection by the close of the 15-day period for response to the objection, the board may not take action on the proposed rate and the proposed rate does not take effect. If the pilot organization does respond to the notice of objection before the close of the response period, the board shall hold a hearing to determine whether the proposed rate is reasonable. If the board finds that the proposed rate is reasonable, the rate is approved and takes effect retroactive to January 1 of the calendar year in which the rate would have taken effect under (b) of this section if no objection had been filed. If the board finds that the proposed rate is not reasonable, the proposed rate is disapproved and does not take effect. In determining what constitutes a reasonable rate, the board shall consider the following factors:

current and historical rates charged for comparable pilotage services;

the actual time aboard the vessel, time engaged in preparing to provide the pilotage services, seasonal and weather conditions, and risks;

the reasonable expenses incurred in providing the pilotage services such as dispatch, transportation, overhead, and other associated expenses;

the financial effect of pilotage expenses on the owner of the vessel, except that this factor shall only be considered if the owner provides all financial information that the board determines is necessary to determine the financial effect;

the number of vessels and volume of pilotage services at issue in the dispute and the number of members of the pilot organization;

the effect of the determination on the income of affected pilots relative to prior years, taking into account changes in vessel tonnage and vessel traffic in the pilotage region from year-to-year;

prior determinations under this subsection; and

other factors the board considers relevant.

Pending the review and approval of the proposed rate for a specific pilotage service by the board under (c) of this section, the current rate then in effect for that pilotage service remains in effect until the board approves the proposed rate. If the proposed rate approved by the board is greater than the current rate, then the master, owner, or operator of the vessel or the vessel is liable for the payment of the additional amount owed for the provision of pilotage services during the pendency of the review by the board due to retroactive application of the approved rate under (c) of this section. If the proposed rate is less than the current rate, then the pilot organization is liable to the master, owner, or operator of the vessel or the vessel for reimbursement of the amount overpaid for the provision of pilotage services during the pendency of the review by the board due to the retroactive application of the approved rate under (c) of this section.

If the board finds under (c) of this section that a proposed rate is not reasonable, the pilot organization may propose a new rate for that pilotage service within 60 days after the decision of the board is issued by sending a notice of intent to adopt a rate for provision of the pilotage service to the board and to all registered agents and publishing the notice on at least three days during a period of 14 consecutive days in a newspaper of general circulation in the state. The notice of intent to adopt a rate must include a copy of the proposed rate and the name and mailing address of the pilot organization that intends to adopt the rate. If a timely objection to the proposed rate is not filed with the board under (c) of this section, the rate takes effect retroactive to January 1 of the same calendar year in which the initial rate proposed under (b) of this section would have taken effect if no objection had been filed. If a timely objection is filed, the provisions of (c) and (d) of this section apply to the proposed rate.

The board shall provide a schedule of rates adopted under this section to agents registered under AS

08.62.187

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 74 SLA 1995)

Cross references. —

For transitional provisions relating to the adoption of rates, including a requirement that each pilot organization recognized by the Board of Marine Pilots shall propose rates for adoption on January 1, 1996, see § 21, ch. 74, SLA 1995 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For tariffs, see 12 AAC 56, art. 3.

Sec. 08.62.050.
Marine pilot coordinator.

The department, with the approval of the board, may hire a marine pilot coordinator who is qualified to assist the board in administering and enforcing the provisions of this chapter. The coordinator is in the partially exempt service under AS

39.25.120

.

The person who is hired as coordinator may not

be an active member of a pilot organization in the state;

work as a pilot while employed as the coordinator, except to the extent required by official duties; or

have a financial interest in a pilot organization or in a pilot vessel or other equipment used by a pilot organization.

In addition to other duties as may be assigned by the board, the marine pilot coordinator may review applications for examination and licensure to ascertain whether the applicant satisfies the applicable requirements.

History.

(§ 7 ch 89 SLA 1991; am § 7 ch 74 SLA 1995)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 56, art. 1.